Indiana, session 2026, HB1413.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-37-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 6. Maternal and Infant Health Care Statistic Annual
Report
Sec. 1. The state department shall collaborate with the following
in the preparation of the report required under this chapter:
(1) The office of the secretary of family and social services.
(2) The department of child services.
(3) The professional licensing agency.
(4) The statewide maternal mortality review committee
established under IC 16-50-1-3.
(5) Any other state entity that has data relevant to the
information required to be reported under this chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) Before April 1 of each year, the state department shall
prepare a report compiling statistics for the previous calendar year
in comparison to statistics from 2021 before the abortion
2026 IN 1413—LS 6647/DI 104


restrictions were enacted following the 2022 special session of the
general assembly. The report must include the following
information concerning 2021 and the previous calendar year:
(1) The number of births in Indiana.
(2) The number of stillborn births in Indiana.
(3) The number of infant deaths in Indiana.
(4) The number of maternal deaths in Indiana.
(5) The number of child investigation cases performed by the
department of child services, and the number of those cases
that were substantiated.
(6) The number of obstetricians and gynecologists that are
practicing in Indiana.
(7) The number of Indiana medical residents who intend to
specialize in obstetrics or are gynecologists who leave Indiana
to practice in another state.
(8) Access to maternal and infant health care, including
pregnancy related and postpartum care, in Indiana and
whether access has decreased in comparison to 2021.
(9) Access to primary care services in Indiana and whether
access has decreased in comparison to 2021.
(10) The cost of maternal and infant health care in Indiana
and whether the cost has increased since 2021.
(11) The number of deliveries of babies reimbursed under
Medicaid and a comparison to the number of deliveries
reimbursed under Medicaid in 2021.
(12) The amount of Medicaid reimbursement provided to
Planned Parenthood in 2021 and whether those recipients
have found an alternative provider.
(13) The impact of Medicaid costs on maternal and infant
health care.
(14) Any other cost savings or increases to Indiana.
(b) The state department shall do the following:
(1) Post the report on the state department's website.
(2) Submit the report to the general assembly in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6.
2026 IN 1413—LS 6647/DI 104